Washington statutes.
RCW 35.38.055

City official as officer, employee, or stockholder of depositary.

Whenever a financial institution is designated by the treasurer in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, as a depositary for funds to be kept by the treasurer of such city or town and such financial institution has filed and had approved a contract with such city or town and complied with chapter 39.58 RCW, such contract shall not be invalid by reason of any official of the city being also an officer, employee, or stockholder of such financial institution.

[ 1984 c 177 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.38.055. Prior: 1955 c 81 s 1.]